Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124E.06, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Two-year moratorium. new text end new text begin Beginning July 1, 2025, through July 1, 2027, the commissioner is prohibited from approving an authorizer's affidavit to charter a school or a supplemental affidavit to add grades or sites to an existing charter school. An authorizer whose affidavit was approved prior to July 1, 2025, may continue planning activities and open the approved school or add grades or sites as planned. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end